Hawaii statutes.
§92-24 Directors of finance and commerce
and consumer affairs; fees. Except as provided in section 91-2.5, the
director of finance and the director of commerce and consumer affairs each
shall charge the following fees:

(1) For administering any oath, $1;

(2) For preparing every photostat copy of any
document on record in the director's office, 50 cents per page or portion
thereof;

(3) For preparing every typewritten copy of any
document on record in the director's office, 50 cents per page or portion thereof;

(4) For preparing a certificate of compliance, $5 for
the original certificate, and $1 for each additional copy thereof, of which $4
from each certificate and 75 cents of each additional copy shall be deposited
in the compliance resolution fund established pursuant to section 26-9(o);

(5) For comparing any document submitted for
certification, 15 cents per page or portion thereof;

(6) For certifying any document on record in the
director's office, 25 cents for each certification;

(7) For all other acts and duties, the fees of which
are not otherwise provided for, such charges as each may from time to time
prescribe. [CC 1859, §690; RL 1925, §1253; RL 1935, §2212; RL 1945, §5813; am L
1949, c 172, §1; RL 1955, §132-14; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 15; am L 1963, c
114, §§1, 3; HRS §92-24; am L 1983, c 153, §1; am L 1988, c 141, §9; gen ch
1993; am L 1999, c 129, §4 and c 301, §3(2)]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next